Louisiana, session 2026, HB288.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:46.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§46.1. Use of certain medical terminology
Entities regulated by this Code may include the term "miscarriage" in
parentheses following the term "spontaneous abortion" when the term "spontaneous
abortion" is utilized in medical documentation, such as medical records or medical
billing.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1300.81 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1300.81. Use of certain medical terminology
When the term "spontaneous abortion" is utilized in medical documentation,
such as medical records or medical billing, the term "miscarriage" may be added in
parentheses following the term "spontaneous abortion".
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.